West Virginia, session 2025, SB551.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Crimes Against the Person. §61-2-3. Penalty for murder of second degree. Murder of the second degree shall be punished punishable by a definite term of imprisonment in the penitentiary which is of not less than ten nor more than forty years 15 years to life imprisonment. A person imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this section is not eligible for parole prior to having served a minimum of ten 15 years of his or her sentence or the minimum period required by the provisions of §62-12-13 of this Code code, whichever is greater.